Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2593.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; university of Arizona; perinatal and pediatric psychiatry access lines; exemption A. The sum of $1,500,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the university of Arizona for direct costs of the perinatal and pediatric psychiatry access line. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.